inc/verb_middle_affixes.lexc
Multichar_Symbols 
@U.ASPECT.IPFV@
@U.TAMA.%0@
@U.TAMA.%0i@
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.4@
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@
@U.OBJECTNUMBER.SG@
@U.OBJECTNUMBER.PL@
@U.INNERPREFIX.ON@

LEXICON Root

0-IPFV ;

LEXICON 0-IPFV

@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.%0@   0-IPFV-AFF ;
@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.%0i@  0-IPFV-AFF ;  ! FIXME

LEXICON 0-IPFV-AFF

@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.INNERPREFIX.ON@gi    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.INNERPREFIX.ON@ts'i  #;
                                                               #;
